Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1086
Qualifications of receiver; sureties; objections; nomination by other parties.

Any party to the suit may, upon the hearing of the application, show, by affidavit or otherwise, objections to the proposed sureties and to the proposed receiver, and what is the value of the property to be taken possession of, and that a receiver ought not to be appointed. He may also nominate a person to be receiver, giving at the same time the names of his proposed sureties. No person shall be appointed receiver who is party, solicitor, counsel, or in any manner interested in the suit.

R.S.1867, Code § 271, p. 439;

R.S.1913, § 7815;

C.S.1922, § 8759;

C.S.1929, § 20-1086;

R.S.1943, § 25-1086.

Attorney for party is not proper counsel for receiver. Veith v. Ress, 60 Neb. 52, 82 N.W. 116 (1900).